Utah statutes.
49-18-301.   Contributions by employees and employers -- Retirement fees.

(1)  In addition to the money paid to this system under Subsection (2), participating employers shall pay the certified contribution rates to the office to maintain this system on a financially and actuarially sound basis.

(2)  Fees collected under Subsection 78A-2-301(1)(j)(i) shall be paid monthly to the office to maintain this system and the system established under Chapter 17, Judges' Contributory Retirement Act.

